Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-814 Encumbered assets.
If any assets of the estate are encumbered by mortgage, pledge, lien, or other
security interest, the personal representative may pay the encumbrance or any
part thereof, renew or extend any obligation secured by the encumbrance or
convey or transfer the assets to the creditor in satisfaction of the creditor's
lien, in whole or in part, whether or not the holder of the encumbrance has
presented a claim, if it appears to be for the best interest of the estate.
Payment of an encumbrance does not increase the share of the distributee
entitled to the encumbered assets unless the distributee is entitled to
exoneration. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next